Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.155

Salaries—Implementation of changes to achieve comparable worth.

Salary changes necessary to achieve comparable worth shall be implemented during the 1983-85 biennium under a schedule developed by the department. Increases in salaries and compensation solely for the purpose of achieving comparable worth shall be made at least annually. Comparable worth for the jobs of all employees under this chapter shall be fully achieved not later than June 30, 1993.

[ 1993 c 281 s 28; 1983 1st ex.s. c 75 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.